Utah statutes.
53A-3-402.11.   Reading Performance Improvement Scholarship Program.

(1)  There is established a Reading Performance Improvement Scholarship Program to assist selected elementary teachers in obtaining a reading endorsement so that they may help improve the reading performance of students in their classes.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall award scholarships of up to $500 to each recipient under the program.

(3)  The board shall give weighted consideration to scholarship applicants who:

(a)  teach in grades kindergarten through three;

(b)  are designated by their schools as, or are seeking the designation of, reading specialist; and

(c)  teach in a rural area of the state.

(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall provide by rule for:

(a)  the application procedure for the scholarship; and

(b)  what constitutes a reading specialist at the elementary school level.

